Colorado, session 2026A, HB1050.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Legislative declaration. (1) The general assembly
finds and declares that:
(a) Teachers, school personnel, and school district staff are highly
qualified professionals whose primary goal is student achievement. It is the
general assembly's intent to support those professionals whenever possible
by reducing non-instructional tasks.
(b) Teachers, school personnel, and school district staff work and
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

communicate with parents and families in their preferred language regularly
for the primary goal of student academic and social emotional success; and
(c) Allowing a local education provider the option to create an
individualized readiness plan for students who meet all kindergarten
readiness standards does not eliminate the consistent communication
provided to parents and families around student testing or achievement.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1014, add (1)(c),
(1)(d), and (1)(e) as follows:
22-7-1014. Preschool individualized readiness plans - school
readiness - assessments.
(1) (c) NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION, AND
SUBJECT TO SUBSECTIONS (1)(d) AND (1)(e) OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL
EDUCATION PROVIDER IS NOT REQUIRED TO ENSURE THAT A STUDENT
RECEIVES AN INDIVIDUALIZED READINESS PLAN AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION IF THE STUDENT DEMONSTRATES
PROFICIENCY ON:
(I) EACH DOMAIN OF COGNITION, PHYSICAL WELL-BEING AND MOTOR
DEVELOPMENT, SOCIAL AND EMOTIONAL DEVELOPMENT, LANGUAGE AND
COMPREHENSION DEVELOPMENT, LITERACY, AND MATH THAT IS ADDRESSED
BY AN ASSESSMENT ADMINISTERED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS
SECTION; AND
(II) THE KINDERGARTEN READING ASSESSMENT ADMINISTERED
PURSUANT TO SECTION 22-7-1205.
(d) A LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER SHALL ENSURE THAT A STUDENT
RECEIVES AN INDIVIDUALIZED READINESS PLAN AS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (1)(a) OF THIS SECTION IF THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL
GUARDIAN REQUESTS THAT THE STUDENT RECEIVES AN INDIVIDUALIZED
READINESS PLAN.
(e) THE INDIVIDUALIZED READINESS PLAN ADMINISTERED PURSUANT
TO SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS SECTION AND THE SCHOOL READINESS
ASSESSMENT ADMINISTERED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION
ARE SUBJECT TO SECTION 22-7-1013 (7)(b)(I)(C), WHICH INCLUDES A
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1050

WRITTEN NOTICE TO THE STUDENT'S PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN. THE
WRITTEN NOTICE MUST INCLUDE:
(I) THE STUDENT'S RESULTS OF THEIR ASSESSMENT DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) IF APPLICABLE, INFORMATION EXPLAINING THAT BECAUSE OF THE
STUDENT'S RESULTS OF THEIR ASSESSMENTS DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTIONS
(1)(c)(I) AND (1)(c)(II) OF THIS SECTION, THE LOCAL EDUCATION PROVIDER
IS NOT REQUIRED, AND DOES NOT INTEND, TO ENSURE THAT THE STUDENT
RECEIVES AN INDIVIDUALIZED READINESS PLAN PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(1)(c) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(III) LANGUAGE INDICATING THAT, NOTWITHSTANDING SUBSECTION
(1)(e)(II) OF THIS SECTION, A PARENT OR LEGAL GUARDIAN MAY REQUEST
THAT THE STUDENT RECEIVES AN INDIVIDUALIZED READINESS PLAN.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1019, amend
(3)(a) introductory portion and (3)(a)(I) as follows:
22-7-1019. Preschool to postsecondary and workforce readiness
- progress reports - effectiveness reports.
(3) (a) At a minimum, the report shall MUST include the following
information for the preceding academic year:
(I) The levels of school readiness demonstrated by students enrolled
in kindergarten ON A STATEWIDE BASIS AND DISAGGREGATED BY SCHOOL
DISTRICT, SCHOOL, GRADE LEVEL, FREE OR REDUCED-COST LUNCH
ELIGIBILITY STATUS, GENDER, ETHNICITY, AND ANY OTHER CHARACTERISTIC
DEEMED TO BE MEANINGFUL BY THE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION;
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 22-7-1205, amend
(1)(a.5) as follows:
22-7-1205. Reading competency - assessments - READ plan
creation - parental involvement.
(1) (a.5) Each local education provider is required to administer a
reading assessment to students enrolled in kindergarten during the first
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1050

ninety days of the school year. If the local education provider administers
the reading assessment within the first sixty days of the school year, it is not
required to administer the literacy component of the school readiness
assessment as provided in section 22-7-1014. (1)(a).
SECTION 5. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration of the
ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly (August
12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that, if a
referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state
constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act within
such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect unless
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1050

approved by the people at the general election to be held in November 2026
and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official declaration of
the vote thereon by the governor.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1050